Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-509
Religious faith of children; preservation.

The religious faith of children coming under the jurisdiction of public welfare officials shall be preserved and protected.

Laws 1935, Spec. Sess., c. 30, § 9, p. 184;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 43-509;

R.S.1943, § 43-509.